test/src/gt-norm-yamls/verbMod_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Modals from lexicon GALGGAT_IV, VIERTTIT_IV

Tests:
  Verb - soajttet: # GALGGAT_IV
    soajttet+V+IV+Inf: soajttet
    soajttet+V+IV+Sup: []
    soajttet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: soajtáv
    soajttet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: soajtá
    soajttet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: soajttebihtit
    soajttet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: soajtti
    soajttet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: soajttiv
    soajttet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: soajtti
    soajttet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: såjtij
    soajttet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: såjtijma
    soajttet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: såjtijda
    soajttet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: såjtijga
    soajttet+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: []
    soajttet+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: såjtitjav
    soajttet+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: såjtitja
    soajttet+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: såjtisj
    soajttet+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: såjtitji
    soajttet+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: soajtálulu


  Verb - galggat: # GALGGAT_IV
    galggat+V+IV+Inf: galggat
    galggat+V+IV+Sup: []
    galggat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: galgav
    galggat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: galga
    galggat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: galggabihtit
    galggat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: galggi
    galggat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: galggiv
    galggat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: galggi
    galggat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: galgaj
    galggat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: galgajma
    galggat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: galgajda
    galggat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: galgajga
    galggat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: []
    galggat+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: galgatjav
    galggat+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: galgatja
    galggat+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: galgasj
    galggat+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: galgatji
    galggat+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: galgalulu

  Verb - hæhttut: # VIERTTIT_IV
    hæhttut+V+IV+Inf: [hæhttut, hähttut]
    hæhttut+V+IV+Sup: []
    hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [hæhttuv, hähttuv]
    hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [hæhttu, hähttu]
    hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [hæhttubihtit, hähttubihtit]
    hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [hæhttuji, hähttuji]
    hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [hæhttujiv, hähttujiv]
    hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [hæhttuji, hähttuji]
    hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [hæhttuj, hähttuj]
    hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [hæhttujma, hähttujma]
    hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [hæhttujda, hähttujda]
    hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [hæhttujga, hähttujga]
    hæhttut+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: []
    hæhttut+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: [hæhttutjav, hähttutjav]
    hæhttut+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: [hæhttutja, hähttutja]
    hæhttut+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: [hæhttusj, hähttusj]
    hæhttut+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: [hæhttutji, hähttutji]
    hæhttut+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: [hæhttululu, hähttululu]
    hæhttut+V+IV+Cond+Sg1: [hæhttululuv, hähttululuv]

  Verb - vierttit: # VIERTTIT_IV
    vierttit+V+IV+Inf: vierttit
    vierttit+V+IV+Sup: []
    vierttit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vierttiv
    vierttit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: viertti
    vierttit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vierttibihtit
    vierttit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vierttiji
    vierttit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vierttijiv
    vierttit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vierttiji
    vierttit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vierttij
    vierttit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: vierttijma
    vierttit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: vierttijda
    vierttit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: vierttijga
    vierttit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: []
    vierttit+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: vierttitjav
    vierttit+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: vierttitja
    vierttit+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: vierttisj
    vierttit+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: vierttitji
    vierttit+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: vierttilulu
